Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2824YC (1) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 704.13, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 704.13 Immunity. 3 1. A person who is justified in using reasonable force 4 against an aggressor in defense of oneself, another person, 5 or property pursuant to section 704.4 is immune from criminal 6 or civil liability for all damages incurred by the aggressor 7 pursuant to the application of reasonable force. 8 2. A defendant in a criminal action may file a motion 9 asserting the immunity granted in this section not less than 10 forty-five days before trial. The court shall conduct a 11 pretrial hearing to determine whether the defendant is immune. 12 If the court finds that the defendant has established a prima 13 facie claim of immunity, the state shall bear the burden of 14 proof by clear and convincing evidence to overcome the claim 15 of immunity. If the state overcomes the claim of immunity, 16 the case will proceed to trial as provided by the rules of 17 criminal procedure. If the state does not overcome the claim 18 of immunity, the case shall be dismissed with prejudice. 19 3. A defendant in a civil action may raise the immunity 20 granted by this section as an affirmative defense as provided 21 by the rules of civil procedure. 22